Massachusetts, session 194th, H2201.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 1 of Chapter 19 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
after the third paragraph:
The commissioner of mental health shall have supervision over the provision of mental
health services to prisoners in the custody of the department of correction, including review and
approval of any contract between the department of correction and any other entity concerning
the provision of mental health services, and shall establish minimum standards for the effective
delivery of such services. At least once each six months the commissioner shall audit each state
correctional facility to determine compliance with the minimum standards.
SECTION 2: Section 17A of Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended in
paragraph (a) by inserting after the words “qualified mental health professional”, the following:-
“, and shall be under the supervision of the department of mental health”
of 1